Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.070

Attorneys' fees.

The court shall, in any action under this chapter, determine the reasonableness of each party's attorneys fees. The court shall take into consideration the following:

(1) The time and labor required, the novelty and difficulty of the questions involved, and the skill requisite to perform the legal service properly;

(2) The likelihood, if apparent to the client, that the acceptance of the particular employment will preclude other employment by the lawyer;

(3) The fee customarily charged in the locality for similar legal services;

(4) The amount involved and the results obtained;

(5) The time limitations imposed by the client or by the circumstances;

(6) The nature and length of the professional relationship with the client;

(7) The experience, reputation, and ability of the lawyer or lawyers performing the services;

(8) Whether the fee is fixed or contingent.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 12.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 4.16.350.

Attorneys' fees: Chapter 4.84 RCW.